Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4767.
people of the state of michigan enact: PART 151 STATEWIDE MICROPLASTICS RESEARCH AND MONITORING PLAN Sec. 15101. (1) The department, in consultation with other state departments and agencies and interested entities, shall develop a statewide microplastics research and monitoring plan to assess the occurrence of microplastics, including in plants and animals, and the impact of microplastics on human and animal health, the health of the Great Lakes, and the critical drinking water supply and identify proposed solutions to address the impacts of microplastic materials, to the extent feasible. (2) The department may enter into 1 or more contracts with research institutions in this state, including those associated with Grand Valley State University, Michigan State University, the University of Michigan, Wayne State University, and other academic and research institutions that have demonstrated expertise relating to the effects of microplastic materials on the Great Lakes, for research services that will contribute directly to the development of the statewide microplastics research and monitoring plan. (3) The statewide microplastics research and monitoring plan must include, but is not limited to, all the following: (a) Strategies for developing a comprehensive plan to identify and evaluate the ecological, health, and economic impacts associated with microplastics in the Great Lakes. (b) Methods for sampling, detecting, and characterizing microplastics that are consistent with recognized standards from scientific, peer-reviewed research or relevant agencies, including, but not limited to, any of the following: (i) The International Joint Commission. (ii) The United States Environmental Protection Agency. (iii) The National Oceanic and Atmospheric Administration. (iv) ASTM International. (c) A list of the baseline concentrations of microplastics in the Great Lakes that includes, but is not limited to, all the following information: (i) An assessment of the associated environmental and human health impacts. (ii) Solutions this state can immediately implement. (iii) Factors that should be considered, such as microplastic particle age, size, shape, type, and location. (d) Research actions that are in alignment with best practices and actions taken by other Great Lakes states and Canada. (e) An investigation into the sources of microplastics and the significance of pathways related to environmental and human health impacts of microplastics. (f) A list of long-term research objectives and strategies for reducing microplastics in the Great Lakes, which must be updated annually and made available to the public. (g) An impact assessment framework for microplastics consistent with best available science and research, and based on the best available information on exposure of microplastics to organisms, including humans, through pathways identified under subdivision (e). (h) Approaches to reduce the introduction of microplastics into the Great Lakes from significant pathways and sources, with an emphasis on the sizes, shapes, and types of microplastics that are associated with significant environmental and human health impacts. (i) Recommendations for both of the following: (i) Policy changes, including statutory changes, or additional research that may be needed. (ii) Solutions to control microplastic introduction into the Great Lakes, such as source elimination, pathway intervention, and public education and outreach. (j) A timeline to implement the statewide microplastics research and monitoring plan and reduce the impacts of microplastics on the Great Lakes. (k) A list of potential barriers to implementation that includes estimated costs and potential funding sources. (4) To develop and implement the statewide microplastics research and monitoring plan, the department may utilize existing information and leverage ongoing federal efforts and efforts of this state and other states, when possible. (5) Not later than July 1, 2026, the department shall submit the statewide microplastics research and monitoring plan to the legislature. Not later than January 30, 2029, the department shall submit a report to the legislature regarding the implementation of the statewide microplastics research and monitoring plan. (6) To the extent that funds are available from bonds and other sources, including federal funds, not later than July 1, 2028, the department shall adopt and implement the statewide microplastics research and monitoring plan. (7) As used in this section: (a) "Department" means the department of environment, Great Lakes, and energy. (b) "International Joint Commission" means a binational organization established by the governments of the United States and Canada under the Boundary Waters Treaty of 1909, and whose responsibilities were expanded under the Great Lakes Water Quality Agreement of 1972. (c) "Microplastics" means a solid plastic particle that has at least 3 dimensions and measures less than 5 millimeters in size and that may contain chemical additives or other substances. Microplastics do not include naturally occurring, non-chemically modified polymers.